Maryland, session 2026, SB0476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 9 of the Acts of the 2025 Special Session
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(b) There is a Maryland Reparations Commission.
(c) The Commission consists of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0476*

SENATE BILL 476
(7) one member of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored
People, [designated by the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People
Maryland State Conference President] APPOINTED JOINTLY BY THE PRESIDENT OF
THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(12) a representative of the Maryland Lynching Truth and Reconciliation
Commission, designated by the Chair of the Commission; [and]
(13) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR
AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE, DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR OF THE
COMMISSION;
(14) ONE FAITH LEADER APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE;
(15) ONE FAITH LEADER APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
[(13)] (16) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) a mental health expert;
(ii) two historians, with expertise in researching the impacts of
enslavement and housing segregation;
(iii) a representative of a religious institution that serves a
community with a high minority population;
(iv) an attorney with expertise in civil rights law or constitutional
law; AND
(v) a representative of an African American financial institution;
and
[(vi) two members of the general public]
(17) FOUR MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC, TWO APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND TWO APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE.
(g) (1) The Commission shall:
(I) HOLD AT LEAST THREE PUBLIC HEARINGS AND
CONTINUOUSLY SOLICIT PUBLIC INPUT;

SENATE BILL 476 3
[(i)] (II) study and make recommendations relating to appropriate
benefits to be offered to individuals impacted by historical inequality;
[(ii)] (III) on or before [January 1, 2027] SEPTEMBER 1, 2028,
submit a preliminary report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly; and
[(iii)] (IV) on or before [November 1, 2027] DECEMBER 1, 2028,
submit a final report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of [3] 4 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2028] 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.